Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202381-829.03
Utilities; critical infrastructure utility workers; list; confidential.

Utilities shall maintain a list of critical infrastructure utility workers by position description without listing individual names. The list shall not be deemed a public record subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, but shall be made available to the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency upon request. The list shall be kept confidential by the agency.

Laws 2023, LB191, § 4.